Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB523.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5104 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5104. Resisting arrest or other law enforcement.A person commits a misdemeanor of the second degree if, with the intent of preventing a public servant from effecting a lawful arrest or discharging any other duty, the person creates a [substantial] risk of bodily injury to the public servant or anyone else, or employs means justifying or requiring [substantial] force to overcome the resistance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516